Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.34
Reduction, defined.

Reduction means measures designed to reduce or eliminate human exposure to lead-based paint hazards through methods including interim controls and abatement.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 36.